dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- थाल्छन्; थाल्छन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थाल्छन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पिरोल्; पिरोल्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पिरोल्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बित्; बित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बित/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बित्; बित; 3 -->
    <pardef n="बित/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समेट्; समेट्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समेट्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाँसो; हाँसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हाँसो__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फाल्; फाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फाल/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फाल्; फाल; 4 -->
    <pardef n="फाल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेनौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निस्क; निस्क; 4 -->
    <pardef n="निस्क__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ँदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विताउ; विताउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विताउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाँस्; हाँस; 2 -->
    <pardef n="हाँस/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौंला</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ु</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाँस्; हाँस; 8 -->
    <pardef n="हाँस/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौंला</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्तै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ता</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छस्; छस्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छस्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गट्; ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ग/ट्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>र</l>
          <r>ट्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="fam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गराउँ; गराउँ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="गराउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाँसे; हाँसे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हाँसे__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चिन; चिन; 2 -->
    <pardef n="चिन__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छेड्; छेड्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छेड्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बुज्; बुज्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बुज्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुहाउं; सुहाउं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुहाउं__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नमिल्; नमिल्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="नमिल्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुहाउँ; सुहाउँ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सुहाउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="थाल्छन्"><i>थाल्छन्</i><par n="थाल्छन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पिरोल्"><i>पिरोल्</i><par n="पिरोल्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बित्"><i>बित</i><par n="बित/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="बित्"><i>बित</i><par n="बित/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="समेट्"><i>समेट्</i><par n="समेट्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हाँसो"><i>हाँसो</i><par n="हाँसो__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="फाल्"><i>फाल</i><par n="फाल/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="फाल्"><i>फाल</i><par n="फाल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="निस्क"><i>निस्क</i><par n="निस्क__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="विताउ"><i>विताउ</i><par n="विताउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हाँस्"><i>हाँस</i><par n="हाँस/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="हाँस्"><i>हाँस</i><par n="हाँस/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छस्"><i>छस्</i><par n="छस्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गट्"><i>ग</i><par n="ग/ट्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गराउँ"><i>गराउँ</i><par n="गराउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हाँसे"><i>हाँसे</i><par n="हाँसे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चिन"><i>चिन</i><par n="चिन__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छेड्"><i>छेड्</i><par n="छेड्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बुज्"><i>बुज्</i><par n="बुज्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुहाउं"><i>सुहाउं</i><par n="सुहाउं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="नमिल्"><i>नमिल्</i><par n="नमिल्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुहाउँ"><i>सुहाउँ</i><par n="सुहाउँ__vblex"/></e>
